District of Columbia statutes.
34-1520

Conformity with settlement agreements.

Nothing in this chapter shall be deemed to require the Commission to modify, set aside, or otherwise adjust the terms of a settlement approved by the Commission in Formal Case No. 945. To the extent the existence of a settlement obviates the need for proceedings or findings as are referred to in this chapter, the Commission may dispense with the proceedings or findings.

May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-107, § 120, 47 DCR 1091